District of Columbia statutes.
26-1401.07

Preexisting powers of universal banks.

A universal bank may exercise any power that it was authorized to exercise under the District of Columbia Banking Code before its certification as a universal bank.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 207, 48 DCR 3244

History